tex/old/pt_BR.aff
SFX V   0      íeis  iuvar
SFX V   0      mos   iuvar
SFX V   uvar   úvas  iuvar
SFX V   r      sse   iuvar
SFX V   ar     ásseis   iuvar
SFX V   r      ssem  iuvar
SFX V   ar     ássemos   iuvar
SFX V   r      sses  iuvar
SFX V   r      ste   iuvar
SFX V   r      stes  iuvar
SFX V   r      va    iuvar
SFX V   r      vam   iuvar
SFX V   ar     ávamos   iuvar
SFX V   r      vas   iuvar
SFX V   ar     áveis    iuvar
SFX V   uvar   úve   iuvar
SFX V   ar     ei    iuvar
SFX V   ar     eis   iuvar
SFX V   uvar   úvem  iuvar
SFX V   ar     emos  iuvar
SFX V   uvar   úves  iuvar
SFX V   uvar   úvo   iuvar
SFX V   ar     ou    iuvar

# IRREGULAR VERBO VIR: vir  TRUIR ergir construir
